Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-207
Invasion of privacy; action; nonassignable.

The action for invasion of privacy created by sections 20-201 to 20-211 and 25-840.01 shall be personal to the subject of the invasion and shall in no case be assignable.

Laws 1979, LB 394, § 7.